New Jersey, session 221, S4036.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2024, c.22, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 94 INTERDEPARTMENTAL ACCOUNTS 70 Government Direction, Management, And Control 74 General Government Services 9430 Salary Increases and Other Benefits GRANTS-IN-AID 05-9430  Salary Increases and Other Benefits ................... $3,000,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Salary Increases and Other Benefits ............... $3,000,000 Grants-in-Aid: 05    Awards for COVID-19 Emergency Frontline State Workers     ($3,000,000) From the amounts hereinabove appropriated for Awards for COVID-19 Emergency Frontline State Workers, there shall be provided by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury, in consultation with the President of Local 195 of International Federation of Professional and Technical Engineers, an allocation to each State agency or department whose employees are represented by Local 195 of International Federation of Professional and Technical Engineers, which allocation shall be distributed as a one-time bonus award to each employee of the State agency or department who is a member of Local 195 of International Federation of Professional and Technical Engineers and who provided emergency frontline State workplace service during the COVID-19 pandemic. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.